Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated to the State Parks and Recreation Department, for
the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $8,476,750 for
debt service.
SECTION 2.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received  by the State Parks and Recre-
ation Department, for the following purposes:
(1) Director’s office ........................ $ 892,986
(2) Central services ........................ $ 26,853,104
(3) Parks development.................... $ 5,411,235
(4) Direct services .......................... $ 92,064,039
(5) Community support
and grants ................................. $ 25,487,306
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses from lottery moneys  allocated from the Parks and Natural Resources Fund to
the State Parks and Recreation Department, for the following purposes:
(1) Director’s office ........................ $ 1,577,131
(2) Central services ........................ $ 25,929,855
(3) Parks development.................... $ 17,665,008
(4) Direct services .......................... $ 75,719,583
(5) Community support
and grants ................................. $ 80,129,375
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$5,467,397 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from lottery moneys allocated from the  Administrative Services Eco-
nomic Development Fund  to the State Parks and Recreation Department for the payment
of debt service.
Enrolled House Bill 5026 (HB 5026-A) Page 1
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses from federal funds collected or received by the State Parks and Recreation  De-
partment, for the following purposes:
(1) Parks development.................... $ 2,083,305
(2) Direct services .......................... $ 2,635,402
(3) Community support
and grants ................................. $ 24,064,435
SECTION 6. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
Passed by House June 13, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 19, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5026 (HB 5026-A) Page 2